Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1781
Minor accounts.

A share account may be issued to and deposits received from a member less than nineteen years of age who may withdraw funds from such account, including the dividends thereon. Payments on a share account by such individual and withdrawals on a share account by such individual shall be valid in all respects.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 81.